Utah statutes.
9-4-1106.   Financial reports -- Audit -- Surety bonds.
(1) (a)  The corporation shall, following the close of each fiscal year,
submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the
governor and the Legislature.
(b)  The report shall contain:
(i)  a complete operating report detailing the corporation's activities; and
(ii)  financial statements of the corporation audited by a certified public
accountant according to generally accepted auditing standards.
(2) (a)  At least once per year, the state auditor shall:
(i)  audit the books and accounts of the corporation; or
(ii)  contract with a nationally recognized independent certified public
accountant to conduct the  audit and review the audit report when it is
completed.
(b)  The corporation shall reimburse the state auditor for the costs of the
audit.
(c)  If the audit is conducted by an independent auditor, the independent
auditor shall submit a copy of the audit to the state auditor for review
within 90 days after the end of the fiscal year covered by the audit.
(3) (a)  The corporation shall maintain a surety bond in the penal sum of
$25,000 for each member of the board.
(b)  The corporation shall maintain a surety bond in the penal sum of $50,000
for the executive director.
(c)  The corporation shall ensure that each surety bond is:
(i)  conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of office to
which it attaches;
(ii)  is issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in Utah as
a surety; and
(iii)  filed in the office of the State Treasurer.
(d)  The corporation shall pay the cost of the surety bonds.
